New Jersey, session 221, S916.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   The Director of the Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services shall ensure that there is parity between service provider and self-directed employee rates, regarding approved services funded by the division and provided to eligible individuals.  These efforts shall include, at a minimum, setting the rates contracted between the division and a service provider as the maximum self-directed employee rates, provided that the rates are for the same service, the same duration, and same level of care. b.    As used in this section: Self-directed employee means a person who is recruited and offered employment directly by an individual who is eligible to receive services funded by the Division of Developmental Disabilities, or the individuals authorized representative, to perform approved services, for which the self-directed employee is qualified. Service provider means an entity or individual who enters into a contract with the Division of Developmental Disabilities to provide approved services to individuals who are eligible to receive services funded by the division. 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act and to secure federal financial participation for State Medicaid expenditures under the federal Medicaid program. 3.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act" P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to effectuate the purposes of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment, and shall apply to all services provided on or after the effective date, except that the Commissioner of Human Services may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.